District of Columbia statutes.
47-4812

Rules.

(a)

The Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

The Chief Financial Officer shall issue rules to implement § 47-4805.

History

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7142(b), 61 DCR 9990